District of Columbia statutes.
1-336.02

Identification of companies.

(a)

Within 90 days after March 21, 2009, the public fund shall make its best efforts to identify all scrutinized companies in which the public fund has direct or indirect holdings. Such efforts shall include reviewing and relying, as appropriate in the public fund’s judgment, on publicly available information regarding companies that have invested more than $20 million in any given year since August 5, 1996, in Iran’s petroleum energy sector, including information provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, international organizations, and government entities.

(b)

On or before the 1st meeting of the public fund held 90 days after March 21, 2009, the public fund shall compile a list of all scrutinized companies entitled “Scrutinized Companies With Activities in the Iran Petroleum Energy Sector List”.

(c)

The public fund shall update and make publicly available annually the Scrutinized Companies with Activities in the Iran Petroleum Energy Sector List.

Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-337, § 102, 56 DCR 939
This section is referenced in § 1-336.03.